Utah statutes.
9-9-205.   Civil jurisdiction.
The state of Utah shall assume jurisdiction over civil causes of action as set
forth in this chapter, between Indians or to which Indians are parties in the
lands described in each tribal resolution 60 days after issuance of the
governor's proclamation to the same extent it has jurisdiction over civil
causes of action as elsewhere within the state. The civil laws of the state
shall have the same force and effect within these lands as they have elsewhere
within the state, except as otherwise provided by this chapter.
